Florida, session 2026, HB1353.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraphs (a) and (d) of subsection (1) of
section 784.048, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
784.048 Stalking; definitions; penalties.—
(1) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Harass" means to engage in a course of conduct
directed at a specific person, whether such person is
specifically named or described in sufficient detail as to be
clearly identifiable, which causes substantial emotional
distress to that person and serves no legitimate purpose.
(d) "Cyberstalk" means:
1. To engage in a course of conduct to communicate, or to
cause to be communicated, directly or indirectly, words, images,
or language by or through the use of electronic mail or
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1353-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1353 2026
electronic communication, directed at or pertaining to a
specific person, whether such person is specifically named or
described in sufficient detail as to be clearly identifiable; or
2. To access, or attempt to access, the online accounts or
Internet-connected home electronic systems of another person
without that person's permission,

causing substantial emotional distress to that person and
serving no legitimate purpose.
Section 2. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
made by this act to section 784.048, Florida Statutes, in a
reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 784.0493, Florida
Statutes, is reenacted to read:
784.0493 Harassment or intimidation based on religious or
ethnic heritage.—
(1) As used in this section, the terms "credible threat"
and "harass" have the same meaning as in s. 784.048(1).
Section 3. For the purpose of incorporating the amendment
made by this act to section 784.048, Florida Statutes, in a
reference thereto, paragraph (e) of subsection (3) of section
1006.147, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read:
1006.147 Bullying and harassment prohibited.—
(3) For purposes of this section:
(e) Definitions in s. 815.03 and the definition in s.
784.048(1)(d) relating to stalking are applicable to this
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1353-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1353 2026
section.
Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1353-00